Mississippi statutes. Title 63. Motor Vehicles and Traffic Regulations
Chapter 9. Traffic Violations Procedure

§ 63-9-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Uniform Highway Traffic Regulation Law-Traffic Violations Procedure.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8126; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-9-3.
Construction.

This chapter shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact it.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8282; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-9-5.
Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter, the meanings ascribed to words and phrases in Article 3 of Chapter 3 of this title shall be fully applicable to this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8126; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-9-7.
Parties deemed guilty of offenses.

Every person who commits, attempts to commit, conspires to commit, or aids or abets in the commission of, any act declared in Chapters 3, 5, or 7 of this title, to be a crime, whether individually or in connection with one or more other persons or as a principal, agent, or accessory, shall be guilty of such offense. Every person who falsely, fraudulently, forcibly, or wilfully induces, causes, coerces, requires, permits, or directs another to violate any provision of said chapter is likewise guilty of such offense.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8277; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-9-9.
Requiring or permitting operation of vehicle in manner contrary to law.

It is unlawful for the owner, or any other person, employing or otherwise directing the driver of any vehicle to require or knowingly to permit the operation of such vehicle upon a highway in any manner contrary to law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8278; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-9-11.
Penalties for violations of Chapters 3, 5 or 7; exemption.

It is a misdemeanor for any person to violate any of the provisions of Chapter 3, 5 or 7 of this title, unless such violation is by such chapters or other law of this state declared to be a felony.

Every person convicted of a misdemeanor for a violation of any of the provisions of such chapters for which another penalty is not provided shall for first conviction thereof be punished by a fine of not more than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) or by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) days; for a second such conviction within one (1) year thereafter such person shall be punished by a fine of not more than Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) or by imprisonment for not more than twenty (20) days or by both such fine and imprisonment; upon a third or subsequent conviction within one (1) year after the first conviction such person shall be punished by a fine of not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months or by both such fine and imprisonment.

Whenever a person not covered under Section 63-1-55 is charged with a misdemeanor violation of any of the provisions of Chapter 3, 5 or 7 of this title, the person shall be eligible to participate in not less than four (4) hours of a traffic safety violator course and thereby have no record of the violation on the person’s driving record if the person meets all the following conditions:

The defendant has a valid Mississippi driver’s license or permit.

The defendant has not had a conviction of a violation under Chapter 3, 5 or 7 of this title within three (3) years before the current offense; any conviction entered before October 1, 2002, does not constitute a prior offense for the purposes of this subsection (3).

The defendant’s public and nonpublic driving record as maintained by the Department of Public Safety does not indicate successful completion of a traffic safety violator course under this section in the three-year period before the offense.

The defendant files an affidavit with the court stating that this is the defendant’s first conviction in more than three (3) years or since October 1, 2002, whichever is the lesser period of time; the defendant is not in the process of taking a course under this section; and the defendant has not completed a course under this section that is not yet reflected on the defendant’s public or nonpublic driving record.

The offense charged is for a misdemeanor offense under Chapter 3, 5 or 7 of this title.

The defendant pays the applicable fine, costs and any assessments required by law to be paid upon conviction of such an offense.

The defendant pays to the court an additional fee of Ten Dollars ($10.00) to elect to proceed under the provisions of this subsection (3).

(i) 1. An eligible defendant may enter a plea of nolo contendere or guilty in person or in writing and present to the court, in person or by mail postmarked on or before the appearance date on the citation, an oral or written request to participate in a course under this subsection (3).

2. The court shall withhold acceptance of the plea and defer sentencing in order to allow the eligible defendant ninety (90) days to successfully complete not less than four (4) hours of a court-approved traffic safety violator course at the cost of the defendant. Upon proof of successful completion entered with the court, the court shall dismiss the prosecution and direct that the case be closed. The only record maintained thereafter shall be the nonpublic record required under Section 63-9-17 solely for use by the courts in determining eligibility under this subsection (3).

If a person pleads not guilty to a misdemeanor offense under any of the provisions of Chapter 3, 5 or 7 of this title but is convicted, and the person meets all the requirements under paragraph (a) of this subsection, upon request of the defendant the court shall suspend the sentence for such offense to allow the defendant forty-five (45) days to successfully complete not less than four (4) hours of a court-approved traffic safety violator course at his own cost. Upon successful completion by the defendant of the course, the court shall set the conviction aside, dismiss the prosecution and direct that the case be closed. The court on its own motion shall expunge the record of the conviction, and the only record maintained thereafter shall be the nonpublic record required under Section 63-9-17 solely for use by the courts in determining an offender’s eligibility under this subsection (3).

An out-of-state resident shall be allowed to complete a substantially similar program in his home state, province or country provided the requirements of this subsection (3) are met, except that the necessary valid driver’s license or permit shall be one issued by the home jurisdiction.

A court shall not approve a traffic safety violator course under this subsection (3) that does not supply at least four (4) hours of instruction, an instructor’s manual setting forth an appropriate curriculum, student workbooks, some scientifically verifiable analysis of the effectiveness of the curriculum and provide minimum qualifications for instructors.

A court shall inform a defendant making inquiry or entering a personal appearance of the provisions of this subsection (3).

The Department of Public Safety shall cause notice of the provisions of this subsection (3) to be available on its official web site.

Failure of a defendant to elect to come under the provisions of this subsection (3) for whatever reason, in and of itself, shall not invalidate a conviction.

No employee of the sentencing court shall personally benefit from a defendant’s attendance of a traffic safety violator course. Violation of this prohibition shall result in termination of employment.

The additional fee of Ten Dollars ($10.00) imposed under this subsection (3) shall be forwarded by the court clerk to the State Treasurer for deposit into a special fund created in the State Treasury. Monies in the special fund may be expended by the Department of Public Safety, upon legislative appropriation, to defray the costs incurred by the department in maintaining the nonpublic record of persons who are eligible for participation under the provisions of this subsection (3).

The provisions of subsection (3) of this section shall not be applicable to violation of any of the provisions of Chapter 3, 5 or 7 of this title committed by the holder of a commercial driver’s license issued under the Mississippi Commercial Driver’s License Law, regardless of whether the violation occurred while operating a commercial motor vehicle or some other motor vehicle.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8275; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 2002, ch. 566, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 315, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 541, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 63-9-12.
Payment of fines by personal check; liability for dishonored check.

Personal checks shall be accepted from Mississippi residents in payment of any fine imposed as a result of a violation of Chapters 3, 5 and 7 of Title 63, Mississippi Code of 1972. The person accepting a check in payment of such a fine shall not be liable if such check is returned not paid provided he makes reasonable efforts to collect the fine.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 480, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 63-9-13.
Disposition of fines and forfeitures for violations of Chapters 3, 5 or 7.

All fines and forfeitures collected upon conviction or upon forfeiture of bail of any person charged with a violation of any of the provisions of Chapters 3, 5 or 7 of this title constituting a misdemeanor shall be deposited in the treasury of the county maintaining the court wherein such conviction or forfeiture was had.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8276; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-9-15.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 141, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

[Codes, 1942, § 8280; Laws, 1938, ch. 200]

§ 63-9-17.
Maintenance of records relating to charged offenses; records and reports of convictions.

Every court shall keep a full record of the proceedings of every case in which a person is charged with any violation of law regulating the operation of vehicles on the highways, streets or roads of this state.

Unless otherwise sooner required by law, within five (5) days after the conviction of a person upon a charge of violating any law regulating the operation of vehicles on the highways, streets or roads of this state, every court in which such conviction was had shall prepare and immediately forward to the Department of Public Safety an abstract of the record of said court covering the case in which said person was so convicted, which abstract must be certified by the person so authorized to prepare the same to be true and correct.

Said abstract must be made upon a form approved by the Department of Public Safety, and shall include the name and address of the party charged, the registration number of the vehicle involved, the nature of the offense, the date of hearing, the plea, the judgment, and if the fine was satisfied by prepayment or appearance bond forfeiture, and the amount of the fine or forfeiture, as the case may be.

Every court shall also forward a like report to the Department of Public Safety upon the conviction of any person of manslaughter or other felony in the commission of which a vehicle was used.

Every court shall also forward a like report to the Department of Public Safety after the satisfactory completion by a defendant of an approved traffic safety violator course under Section 63-9-11, and the department shall make and maintain a private, nonpublic record to be kept for a period of ten (10) years. The record shall be solely for the use of the courts in determining eligibility under Section 63-9-11, as a first-time offender, and shall not constitute a criminal record for the purpose of private or administrative inquiry. Reports forwarded to the Department of Public Safety under this subsection shall be exempt from the provisions of the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983.

The failure by refusal or neglect of any such judicial officer to comply with any of the requirements of this section shall constitute misconduct in office and shall be grounds for removal therefrom.

The Department of Public Safety shall keep copies of all abstracts received hereunder for a period of three (3) years at its main office and the same shall be open to public inspection during reasonable business hours. This subsection shall not apply to nonpublic records maintained solely for the use of the courts in determining offender eligibility.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8281; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1985, ch. 363, § 4; Laws, 1990, ch. 351, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 566, § 2; Laws, 2004, ch. 315, § 2; Laws, 2005, ch. 541, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 63-9-19.
Compensation of peace officers for services in traffic violation cases.

The collection of fees for the performance of services in making arrests in traffic violation cases and taking the accused before the court for trial or to jail awaiting trial shall be restricted to that peace officer who performs such services, and, if performed by a highway patrolman, shall not be compensated. No peace officer accompanying a highway patrolman in the performance of such duties shall receive any compensation.

No peace officer shall be compensated for attending court in traffic violation cases wherein a plea of guilty is entered unless said peace officer was the arresting officer.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8285.7; Laws, 1958, ch. 288.

§ 63-9-21.
Uniform Traffic Ticket Law.

This section shall be known as the Uniform Traffic Ticket Law.

All traffic tickets, except traffic tickets filed electronically as provided under subsection (8) of this section, shall be printed in the original and at least two (2) copies and such other copies as may be prescribed by the Commissioner of Public Safety. All traffic tickets shall be uniform as prescribed by the Commissioner of Public Safety and the Attorney General, except as otherwise provided in subsection (3)(b) and except that the Commissioner of Public Safety and the Attorney General may alter the form and content of traffic tickets to meet the varying requirements of the different law enforcement agencies. The Commissioner of Public Safety and the Attorney General shall prescribe a separate traffic ticket, consistent with the provisions of subsection (3)(b) of this section, to be used exclusively for violations of the Mississippi Implied Consent Law.

Every traffic ticket issued by any sheriff, deputy sheriff, constable, county patrol officer, municipal police officer or State Highway Patrol officer for any violation of traffic or motor vehicle laws shall be issued on the uniform traffic ticket or uniform implied consent violation ticket consisting of an original and at least two (2) copies and such other copies as may be prescribed by the Commissioner of Public Safety.

The traffic ticket, citation or affidavit issued to a person arrested for a violation of the Mississippi Implied Consent Law shall contain a place for the trial judge hearing the case or accepting the guilty plea, as the case may be, to sign, stating that the person arrested either employed an attorney or waived his right to an attorney after having been properly advised of his right to have an attorney. If the person arrested employed an attorney, the name, address and telephone number of the attorney shall be entered or written on the ticket, citation or affidavit.

Every traffic ticket shall show, among other necessary information, the name of the issuing officer, the name of the court in which the cause is to be heard, and the date and time the person is to appear to answer the charge. The ticket shall include information that will constitute a complaint charging the offense for which the ticket was issued, and when duly sworn to and filed with a court of competent jurisdiction, prosecution may proceed thereunder.

The traffic ticket shall contain a space to include the current address and current telephone number of the person being charged. It shall not contain a space to include the social security number of the person being charged.

All traffic tickets, except traffic tickets filed electronically under subsection (8) of this section, shall be bound in book form, shall be consecutively numbered and each traffic ticket shall be accounted for to the officer issuing such book. The traffic ticket books shall be issued to sheriffs, deputy sheriffs, constables and county patrol officers by the chancery clerk of their respective counties, to each municipal police officer by the clerk of the municipal court, and to each State Highway Patrol officer by the Commissioner of Public Safety.

The chancery clerk, clerk of the municipal court and the Commissioner of Public Safety shall keep a record of all traffic ticket books issued and to whom issued, accounting for all books printed and issued. All traffic tickets submitted electronically shall be filed automatically with the Commissioner of Public Safety and either the clerk of the municipal court or clerk of the justice court using the system of electronic submission for the purpose of maintaining a record of account as prescribed by this subsection (5).

The original traffic ticket, unless the traffic ticket is filed electronically as provided under subsection (8) of this section, shall be delivered by the officer issuing the traffic ticket to the clerk of the court to which it is returnable to be retained in that court’s records and the number noted on the docket. However, if a ticket is issued and the person is incarcerated based upon the conduct for which the ticket was issued, the ticket shall be filed with the clerk of the court to which it is returnable no later than 5:00 p.m. on the next business day, excluding weekends and holidays, after the date and time of the person’s incarceration; however, failure to timely file the traffic ticket shall not be grounds for dismissal of the traffic ticket and shall not prevent the person’s release from incarceration. The officer issuing the traffic ticket shall also give the accused a copy of the traffic ticket. The clerk of the court shall file a copy with the Commissioner of Public Safety within forty-five (45) days after judgment is rendered showing such information about the judgment as may be required by the commissioner or, in cases in which no judgment has been rendered, within one hundred twenty (120) days after issuance of the ticket. Other copies that are prescribed by the commissioner pursuant to this section shall be filed or retained as may be designated by the commissioner. All copies shall be retained for at least two (2) years.

Failure to comply with the provisions of this section shall constitute a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punishable by a fine of not less than Ten Dollars ($10.00) nor more than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00).

Law enforcement officers and agencies may file traffic tickets, including tickets issued for a violation of the Mississippi Implied Consent Law and general misdemeanor affidavits, by computer or electronic means if the ticket or affidavit conforms in all substantive respects, including layout and content, as provided under subsections (2) or (3)(b) of this section. The provisions of subsection (4) of this section requiring tickets bound in book form do not apply to a ticket that is produced by computer or electronic means. Information concerning tickets produced by computer or electronic means shall be available for public inspection in substantially the same manner as provided for the uniform tickets described in subsection (2) of this section.

The defendant shall be provided with a paper copy of the ticket. A law enforcement officer who files a ticket or misdemeanor affidavit electronically shall be considered to have certified, signed and sworn to the ticket or misdemeanor affidavit and has the same rights, responsibilities and liabilities as with all other tickets or affidavits issued pursuant to this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8285.5; Laws, 1958, ch. 260, §§ 1-7; Laws, 1982, ch. 423, § 13; Laws, 1982, ch. 464; Laws, 1984, ch. 352; Laws, 1985, ch. 363, § 3; Laws, 1991, ch. 480, § 3; Laws, 2003, ch. 550, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 376, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 481, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 566, § 1; Laws, 2011, ch. 342, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 464, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 550, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 472, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 504, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 13, 2016).

§ 63-9-23.
Exclusivity of procedure prescribed in chapter.

The foregoing provisions of this chapter shall govern all police officers in making arrests without a warrant for violations of Chapters 3, 5 and 7 of this title for offenses committed in their presence, but the procedure prescribed herein shall not otherwise be exclusive of any other method prescribed by law for the arrest and prosecution of a person for an offense of like grade.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8279; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-9-25.
Deposit of driver’s license in lieu of bail.

Whenever any person lawfully possessed of a driver’s license theretofore issued to him by the Department of Public Safety of the State of Mississippi, or under the laws of any other state or territory, or the District of Columbia of the United States, shall be arrested and charged with any offense against the traffic or motor vehicle laws or rules of the road of this state, or any municipality thereof, he shall have the option of depositing his driver’s license so issued to him with the arresting officer or the court in lieu of any other security which may be required for his appearance in any court in this state in answer to such charge lodged in such court.

If such person arrested elects to deposit his license as provided, the arresting officer or court shall issue such person a receipt for said license upon a form furnished or prescribed by the Mississippi Department of Public Safety, and thereafter said person shall be permitted to operate a motor vehicle upon the highways of this state and streets of the municipalities thereof during the pendency of the case in which the license was deposited unless his license or privilege is otherwise revoked, suspended or canceled, but in no case for a period longer than thirty (30) days.

The clerk of the court in which the charge is lodged shall immediately forward to the department the license of the driver deposited in lieu of bail if the driver fails to appear in answer to the charge against him. The Commissioner of Public Safety or his authorized agent shall, upon receipt of a license so forwarded by the court, suspend the driver’s license and driving privilege of the defaulting driver until notified by the court that the charge against such driver has been finally adjudicated.

The commissioner shall, upon receipt of a license of a nonresident driver, forward notice to his counterpart in the state of the driver’s residence of the fact that such driver has been charged with a traffic or motor vehicle offense or a violation of the rules of the road and has so deposited his license in lieu of bail.

The making of an application for a duplicate driver’s license during the period when the original license is posted for an appearance in a court shall be unlawful, shall constitute a misdemeanor and a person convicted thereof shall be subject to a fine of not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both fine and imprisonment.

The provisions of this section shall not govern arrests for driving under the influence of alcohol. The procedure set forth in the Mississippi Implied Consent Law, Sections 63-11-1 through 63-11-47, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall apply.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 384; Laws, 1976, ch. 387; Laws, 1981, ch. 491, § 11; Laws, 1990, ch. 350, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 63-9-27.
Posting of guaranteed arrest bond certificate in lieu of cash bail.

A guaranteed arrest bond certificate with respect to which a fidelity and surety company has become surety as provided in subsection (2) of this section, when posted by the person whose signature appears thereon, shall be accepted in lieu of cash bail in an amount not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200.00), as a bail bond, to guarantee the appearance of such person in any court in this state at such time as may be required by the court, when such person is arrested for violation of any traffic laws of any municipality or county of this state, except for the offense of driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquors, drugs or narcotics, or for any felony, and the alleged violation was committed prior to the date of expiration shown on such guaranteed arrest bond certificate.

Any such guaranteed arrest bond certificate so posted as a bail bond in any court in this state shall be subject to the forfeiture and collection provisions of law applicable to a bail bond, except that any judgment forfeiting a guaranteed arrest bond certificate rendered under such forfeiture and collection provisions shall, at any time within thirty (30) days after rendition, be set aside upon the surrender, or the appearance and trial and conviction or acquittal of the defendant, or upon a continuance granted upon motion of the district attorney after such appearance.

Any domestic or foreign insurance company which has qualified to transact fidelity and surety insurance business in this state may, in any year, become surety in an amount not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200.00) with respect to each guaranteed arrest bond certificate issued in such year by an automobile club, automobile association or insurance company authorized to transact automobile liability insurance business within this state or by the fidelity and surety company itself.

The term “guaranteed arrest bond certificate,” as used in this section, means a printed card or other certificate issued by an automobile club, automobile association, insurance company authorized to transact automobile liability insurance within this state, or an insurance company authorized to transact fidelity and surety insurance business within this state to any of its members or insureds, which is signed by such member or insured, and contains a printed statement that a fidelity and surety company authorized to do business in this state guarantees the appearance of the person whose signature appears on the card or certificate, and that such company will, in the event of the failure of such person to appear in court at the time of trial, pay any fine or forfeiture imposed on such person in an amount not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200.00).

The issuance of a “guaranteed arrest bond certificate,” as defined above, by an automobile club, automobile association or insurance company not authorized to transact fidelity and surety insurance business in this state shall not be construed as engaging in fidelity and surety insurance business in this state by such automobile club, automobile association or insurance company.

This section shall be supplementary and complementary to section 63-9-25 and shall not be construed as affecting or amending that section in any way.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 318; Laws, 1981, ch. 491, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 63-9-29.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2002, ch. 320, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

[Laws, 1985, ch. 363, § 1; Laws, 1990, ch. 403, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1990.]

§ 63-9-31.
Additional surcharge for traffic violations to fund automation of citations issued by Highway Safety Patrol and wireless radio communications programs; funding of agency expenses; deposit of monies into State General Fund.

In addition to any other monetary penalties and other penalties imposed by law, any county, municipality or the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District Patrol which participates in a wireless radio communications program approved by the applicable governing authorities may assess an additional surcharge in an amount not to exceed Ten Dollars ($10.00) on each person upon whom a court imposes a fine or other penalty for each violation of Title 63, Mississippi Code of 1972, except offenses relating to vehicular parking or registration. On all citations issued by Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol officers, a surcharge in the amount of Ten Dollars ($10.00) shall be collected by the court and deposited as provided in subsection (2) of this section. The proceeds from the surcharge on citations issued by county and municipal law enforcement officers or the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District Patrol may be used by a county or municipality only to fund that county’s or municipality’s or the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District Patrol’s participation in the wireless radio communications program by funding public safety wireless communications systems and related computer and communications equipment. The proceeds from the surcharge on citations issued by Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol officers shall be used as provided in subsection (2) of this section. All proceeds from the surcharge imposed by this subsection shall be deposited into a special fund in the Department of Public Safety’s Office of Public Safety Planning. The Office of Public Safety Planning shall promulgate rules and procedures relating to the administration of the special fund and the disbursement of monies in the fund to participating governmental entities. The maximum amount that a governmental entity may receive from the special fund shall be an amount equal to the deposits made into the fund by that entity, less one percent (1%) to be retained by the Office of Public Safety Planning to defray the costs of administering the special fund. Interest earned on the special fund shall remain in the fund and shall be used by the Office of Public Safety Planning to further defray the costs of administering the special fund.

Deposits into the special fund resulting from citations issued by the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol shall be utilized as follows: Fifty percent (50%) of the deposits into the special fund shall be used to automate the citations issued by Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol officers (including the transmittal of citations to the justice court, retrieval of the disposition from the justice court, and updating the driver’s records) and fifty percent (50%) of the deposits into the special fund shall be used for the purpose of funding wireless communications and related computer equipment and computer software, subject to the approval of the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services.

Approval of a wireless radio communications program must be given by the applicable governing authorities when:

The program includes the sharing of support facilities including, but not limited to, towers, shelters and microwave by participating entities; or

The program includes the establishment of a mutual aid system using common radio frequency channels between participating entities; or

The program sets forth a feasible methodology that utilizes the radio frequency spectrum in an efficient manner.

Participating counties, municipalities, the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District Patrol and the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol must provide notification of facilities available for interoperability to the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services annually.

Counties and municipalities and the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District Patrol participating in a wireless radio communications program and the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol must comply with competitive bidding requirements prescribed in Section 31-7-13 and are encouraged to utilize an open architecture, nonproprietary system.

From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund and all user charges and fees authorized under this section shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law.

From and after July 1, 2016, no state agency shall charge another state agency a fee, assessment, rent or other charge for services or resources received by authority of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 569, § 12; Laws, 2002, ch. 486, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 441, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 311, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 522, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 459, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 63-9-33.
Assessment of additional surcharge on traffic violations and vehicular parking or registration offenses by certain municipalities to fund computerized crime prevention measures.

In addition to any other monetary penalties and other penalties imposed by law, any municipality having a population of fifteen thousand (15,000) or more according to the most recent federal decennial census may assess an additional surcharge in an amount not to exceed One Dollar ($1.00) for each violation of Title 63 and offenses related to vehicular parking or registration. The proceeds from the surcharge shall be dedicated to the use of the municipal police department and used solely to offset the cost of implementation of certain computerized crime prevention measures and the equipment necessary therefor.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 465, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 63-9-35.
Certain traffic citations issued in other states are prohibited from being placed on a driver’s record or reported to insurance.

A traffic citation issued by another state from the use of an automated traffic law enforcement system or a traffic law enforcement method not authorized by the State of Mississippi shall not be placed on the person’s driving record in this state.

A traffic citation issued by another state from the use of an automated traffic law enforcement system or a traffic law enforcement method not authorized by the State of Mississippi shall not be reported to an insurance company for insurance purposes.

For the purposes of this section, ‘automated traffic law enforcement system‘ means a camera, optical device or other equipment that:

Detects a traffic law violation;

Records images of the license plate of a motor vehicle that is not operated in compliance with traffic laws; and

Issues a citation for a traffic law violation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 398, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 63-9-37.
Recognition of traffic fines resulting from automated recording equipment of another state; suspension of driver’s license for failure to pay fine.

The Mississippi Department of Public Safety shall only recognize any civil or criminal fine, fee, citation or penalty for a violation of compliance with traffic signals, traffic speeds or other traffic laws, rules or regulations in another state that results from the use of automated recording equipment or system as defined under Section 17-25-19 if that state is a member of the Driver License Compact as provided under Section 63-1-103. Further, the Mississippi Department of Public Safety shall not suspend the driver’s license of a person for failure to pay any civil or criminal fine, fee, citation or penalty for such a violation unless the state that is due the fine, fee, citation or penalty is a member of the Driver License Compact.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 340, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 14, 2013.).